Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1601
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 8-1601 to 8-1605, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Bank has the same meaning as in section 8-909;

(2) Bank holding company has the same meaning as in section 8-909;

(3) Bankers bank means a bank formed pursuant to section 8-1602;

(4) Department means the Department of Banking and Finance;

(5) Foreign bank holding company has the same meaning as out-of-state bank holding company in section 8-909;

(6) Foreign bankers bank means a bank which is chartered in a foreign state and which is:

(a) Insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation;

(b) Owned substantially by banks in the state in which the bank was chartered; and

(c) Directly and through its subsidiaries engaged exclusively in providing services for other banks and their officers, directors, and employees;

(7) Foreign state means any state of the United States other than the State of Nebraska, any territory of the United States, Puerto Rico, Guam, American Samoa, the Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands, the Virgin Islands, or the District of Columbia; and

(8) Owned substantially means at least eighty percent of the outstanding voting stock is owned.

Laws 1986, LB 1123, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 396, § 15;

Laws 2006, LB 876, § 21.